California, session 20252026, AB1620.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17226 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17226. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, there shall be allowed as a deduction the amount paid or incurred by a qualified taxpayer during the taxable year as premiums on a homeowners’ insurance policy on the taxpayer’s primary residence.(b) For purposes of this section, “primary the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Primary residence” means a residence that is eligible for either of the following:(1)(A) The homeowner’s exemption, as described in Section 218.(2)(B) The veteran’s exemption, as described in Section 205 and subdivisions (o), (p), (q), and (r) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means an individual or a married couple if filing a joint return whose adjusted gross income does not exceed the following:(A) In the case of a taxpayer who is a head of household, a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 17046, or a married couple filing a joint return, two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).(B) In the case of a taxpayer other than as described in subparagraph (A), one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000).(c) (1) For purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:(A) The specific goal, purpose, and objective that the deduction allowed by this section will achieve is to assist homeowners in affording the cost of homeowners’ insurance, which has increased in price as some carriers have decided not to insure homes in certain parts of the state and others have exited the state, leaving Californians with fewer options for this important insurance coverage.(B) The performance indicators indicator for the Legislature to use in determining whether the deduction achieves the stated goal, purpose, and objective is the number of taxpayers receiving allowed a deduction pursuant to this section.(2) (A) No later than December 1, 2027, and each December 1 thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of taxpayers that received allowed a deduction pursuant to this section for the most recent taxable year to the extent that data is available.(B) The disclosure provisions of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.